South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S596.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Social Services, relating to Supplemental Benefits for Adoption and Medical Assistance, designated as Regulation Document Number 5315, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The State of South Carolina aims to support adoption laws by making possible through public supplemental benefits the most appropriate adoption of each child certified by the Department of Social Services as requiring a supplemental benefit to assure adoption. The Department of Social Services is charged with promulgating regulations to carry out the State's purpose; and therefore, is proposing to amend Regulation 114-4380 to promote compliance with statutory authority and to further the Department's mission to promote safety, permanency, stability, and well-being of children who are in the State's foster care system. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 28, 2024. ----XX----